California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8071.

The president and secretary shall proceed to ascertain the amount of such loss and make adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

8072.

If the claim is for more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), the secretary shall forthwith notify each member of the executive committee. At each regular meeting of the directors the secretary shall furnish them with a statement showing all claims filed since the previous regular meeting of the directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

8073.

If in any case there is a failure of the parties to agree upon the amount of such loss they may submit the question of the amount to arbitration. In that event the president of the reinsurer shall appoint one disinterested person to act as an arbitrator, and the member shall appoint another.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8074.

If the two arbitrators thus appointed fail to agree upon the amount of such loss, they shall select a third disinterested person to act with them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8075.

Such arbitrators so appointed may examine witnesses and do all other things necessary to the proper determination of the amount of loss sustained by the claimant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8076.

The arbitrators shall make their award in writing to the president of the reinsurer and to the member. Such award shall be final as to the amount of the loss sustained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8077.

The pay of each arbitrator shall be five dollars per day for each day’s services rendered, and five cents for each mile necessarily traveled in the discharge of his duties. Such compensation shall be paid by the claimant unless the award of the arbitrators exceeds the sum offered by the reinsurer in liquidation of the loss. In the latter case such expense shall be paid by the reinsurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8078.

The president and secretary of the reinsurer may secure the services of an adjuster to represent it on any loss, subject to confirmation by its executive committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Coverage of Loss [8090. - 8097.]

8090.

When the amount of any ascertained loss exceeds the cash funds of the reinsurer and also exceeds one-eighth of one per cent of the total amount of the insurance in force in the reinsurer, the president shall convene its directors. On so convening, the directors shall assess each member in proportion to the member’s reinsurance, taken in connection with the rate of premium under which such reinsurance is classified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8091.

When the amount of such loss does not exceed one-eighth of one per cent of the total amount of insurance in force in the reinsurer, the directors may, by resolution in writing signed by two-thirds of all the directors while present at a meeting, borrow in the name of the reinsurer and give its evidence of indebtedness therefor, in an amount not exceeding one-eighth of one per cent of the total amount of such insurance in force.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8092.

The term of such loan shall not be longer than twelve months, and the date of maturity shall not be more than thirty days beyond the date of the next annual meeting of the reinsurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8093.

The board of directors may at their annual meeting levy an assessment not exceeding twenty-five cents on the $100 of reinsurance. The sum so raised shall constitute a reserve fund to be used in emergency cases only. Another assessment for this purpose shall not be made while this reserve fund remains intact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8094.

Whenever an assessment is made, the secretary shall immediately notify every member by registered letter addressed to the secretary of the member at its usual post-office address, stating:

(a) The amount of such loss.

(b) The sum due from the member as its share.

(c) To whom payment is to be made.

(d) The time, not less than thirty nor more than ninety days from the date of mailing notice, when payment is to be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8095.

An action may be brought against any member of such reinsurer that neglects or refuses to pay the liabilities due such reinsurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8096.

The directors of any such reinsurer who wilfully refuse or neglect to perform the duties imposed upon them by law or by the by-laws of the reinsurer are liable in their individual capacity to the reinsurer sustaining loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8097.

An action may also be brought and maintained against any such reinsurer by members thereof to recover sums owing them for losses sustained when payment is withheld after the amount of such losses is determined and is due by the terms of the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Cancellation of Membership [9010. - 9012.]

9010.

Any member of such reinsurer may cancel any policy of reinsurance at any time while the reinsurer continues its reinsurance business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9011.

The cancellation may be accomplished only by complying with all of the following requirements:

(a) Surrender of policy for cancellation.

(b) Giving ten days’ notice in writing to the secretary of the reinsurer.

(c) Payment of the member’s share of all claims that exist against the reinsurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.

The reinsurer may cancel or terminate any policy by giving the member ten days’ written notice and returning to it any excess of premium paid during the term of the policy over the cost of its reinsurance as measured by the rules or methods of admitted fire insurers issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Reports and Statements [9030. - 9031.]

9030.

The secretary shall prepare an annual statement, showing the condition of such reinsurer on December thirty-first and a supplemental report of the business of the reinsurer to January thirty-first and present both reports at the ensuing annual meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9031.

The president and secretary shall, on or before the first day of March of each year, prepare under oath, and transmit to the commissioner, a statement of the condition of the insurer as of the thirty-first day of December then next preceding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Dissolution [9050. - 9050.]

9050.

Any such reinsurer may be proceeded against and dissolved in the same manner and upon the same conditions as in the case of other domestic insurers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Exemptions [9060. - 9060.]

9060.

The provisions of Sections 980, 981, 982, 983, 984, 985, 986, 987, 988, 989, 990, 991, 992, and 993 shall not apply to county mutual fire reinsurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Fraternal Fire Insurers [9080. - 9103.]

9080.

Except as provided by this chapter, an association organized and operating on or before January 1, 1947, under this chapter is not governed by the provisions of this code or other insurance laws of this State. No other association shall be formed or transact insurance under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

9080.1.

On and after January 1, 1954, no association shall transact insurance under this chapter unless it has theretofore received and continues to hold a certificate of exemption from the commissioner.

Before procuring such certificate such association shall file with the commissioner certified copies of the articles of incorporation, association, by-laws, rules and regulations or other organization or governing documents, together with certified copies of all evidences of insurance which it proposes to issue. It shall thereafter file with the commissioner certified copies of all amendments to such documents or evidences. The commissioner shall issue such certificate of exemption upon application by such association and a showing by it that it qualifies therefor under the provisions of this chapter.

Such certificate of exemption is subject to suspension or revocation by the commissioner if the organization fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

Such association is subject to Sections 1 to 41, inclusive, and to Articles 4 and 14 of Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1564.)
-------------------------------------------

9080.3.

Any religious organization engaged in the business of writing fire insurance solely for its members and its churches on the effective date of this section, and which has been doing so continuously in California since January 1, 1925, is subject to all applicable provisions of this chapter.

Any religious organization described in this section shall not write insurance:

(a) In excess of 10 percent of its capital and surplus as shown in its last statement on file with the commissioner, on any one risk, or in excess of 20 percent of its capital and surplus as shown in its last statement on file with the commissioner in any one city block within an incorporated city without immediately reinsuring the excess over those amounts.

(b) On business property within any incorporated city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9081.

Secret fraternal societies, having lodges, councils or granges in this State, conducting their business and securing their membership on the lodge, council or grange system exclusively, and having ritualistic work and ceremonies in their lodges, councils or granges, may form an insurer by association of the members of their order or society, binding themselves to contribute to each other’s loss by fire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9082.

Such association shall be formed by filing a certificate in the office of the Secretary of State and a like certificate in the office of the clerk of each county in which a member has property insured in said association. Each such certificate shall state:

(a) Generally, the objects of the association.

(b) Its principal place of business.

(c) The names of its officers.

Such certificates shall be signed by the officers of the association and verified by at least three of them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9083.

The officers of the association shall be members of the association, having property insured therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9084.

Such an association may insure the property of its members against loss or damage by fire for an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) on any one risk, subject to the following conditions as to amount:

(a) A risk in excess of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) shall not be binding as to such excess until risks to the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) have been written and all premiums paid thereon.

(b) A risk of more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) shall not be binding as to such excess until risks to the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) have been written and all premiums paid thereon.

(c) A risk regardless of amount, shall not be binding until risks to the amount of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) have been written and all premiums paid thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

9085.

A risk shall not be written by such association except for members in good standing on the books of the society forming the association. A suspension or withdrawal from membership in such society shall suspend the insurance until the member is restored to good standing in the society and association. A restoration to membership after suspension therefrom shall not extend the term of the insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9086.

All such associations shall classify the property insured by them at the time of issuing policies on such property. The classification shall be under different rates, corresponding as nearly as practicable to the greater or less risk from fire loss attached to the insured property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9087.

No property within the corporate limits of any city or town shall be insured except dwellings and the contents thereof, grange halls and the contents thereof, other grange property, and any buildings appurtenant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

9087.5.

Section 9087 is not applicable to insurance covering an insurable interest of a member in property which was insured by the association prior to the inclusion of the property within the corporate limits of a city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

9088.

Such association shall provide in its by-laws for the ascertainment of loss or damage by fire, and for the payment thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9089.

Such association by and in its own name may:

(a) Sue and be sued.

(b) Loan such funds as it has on hand in such manner as its articles of association and its by-laws provide.

(c) Own sufficient real property for its business purposes, and such other real property as it becomes necessary to purchase on foreclosure of its mortgages. Real estate obtained by such foreclosure shall be sold and conveyed within five years from the time title vests in the association.

(d) Make such by-laws, not inconsistent with the laws of this State, as are necessary for its government and for the transaction of its business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9090.

Such association creates a mutual agreement of its members to participate in each other’s loss by fire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9091.

Every insured shall give to the association a written instrument binding him to pay his share, proportioned to his insurance in the association, of the expense of operation and of the fire loss sustained by it during the term of his policy. Such loss consists of amounts paid or owing to insureds by reason of losses under the terms of fire policies issued by the association, together with the necessary expenses of the association in respect to such losses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9092.

Persons insuring property with the association shall, at the time of effecting the insurance, pay such a percentage in cash, and such other charges, as are required by the rules or by-laws of the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9093.

Policies of the association may be canceled by either party thereto. In such case settlement or adjustment shall be made in accordance with the terms of the by-laws of the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

9094.

The secretary of each such association shall prepare an annual statement showing the financial condition of the association, including a statement of all assets and liabilities, as of the thirty-first day of December then next preceding. Such statement shall be verified under oath by the president and secretary of the association. A copy of the verified statement shall be transmitted to the commissioner on or before the first day of March of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

9095.

(a) (1) An association may, if it has issued an insurance policy against fire, endorse that policy to extend the coverage thereof to include loss or damage caused by windstorm, cyclone, tornado and hail, explosion, riot, riot attending a strike, aircraft, vehicles and smoke, and to include waiver of the fallen building clause.

(2) An association may also insure against any or all of the following:

(A) Water damage from plumbing and heating systems.

(B) Rupture or bursting of steam or hot water heating system.

(C) Vandalism or malicious mischief.

(D) Glass breakage.

(E) Ice, snow, and freezing.

(F) Fall of trees.

(G) Collapse.

(H) Burglary and theft.

(I) Mysterious disappearance.

(J) Liability.

(b) As used in this section “explosion” does not include explosions (1) of any boiler, heater, or other fired pressure vessel, caused by pressure of contents, (2) of any unfired pressure vessel or of any piping caused by pressure of contents or vacuum, (3) of any engine, turbine, compressor, pump, or wheel, (4) of any electrical apparatus, or (5) of any other machine having moving or rotating parts. This restricted definition of “explosion” does not exclude loss or damage by fire only where fire ensues.

(c) As used in this section, the terms “boiler,” “heater,” and “pressure vessel,” do not include hot water heaters used solely to provide hot water for delivery to faucets for domestic purposes and having a storage capacity of not more than 50 gallons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 190, Sec. 2.   (AB 407)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9096.

An association certificated under this chapter is hereby declared to be a charitable and benevolent institution, and all of its funds shall be exempt from all and every state, county, district, municipal, and school tax, other than taxes on real estate and office equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1564.)
-------------------------------------------

9097.

An association or organization certified under this chapter may reinsure all of its policies with, and, upon the assumption of all of its liabilities, may transfer its assets to, any mutual insurer admitted to transact the classes of insurance embraced within the policies issued by such organization or association, upon compliance with Sections 9098 through 9103, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

9098.

The plan and agreement by which any transaction permitted by Section 9097 is to be effected shall be approved by the board of directors or other governing body of that organization or association and submitted to the commissioner accompanied by an application for approval thereof and a fee of four hundred ninety-four dollars ($494).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 58.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9099.

The commissioner shall examine such plan and agreement and may require such provisions to be inserted in the agreement and such actions to be taken in connection with the transaction (including but not limited to: (1) the terms of the reinsurance, transfer and assumption, (2) the terms of the notice of the vote thereon by the members of such organization or association, and (3) the manner and form of voting thereon by such members) as he may deem necessary in order that the transaction shall be fair and equitable to the members of such organization or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

9100.

When any such plan and agreement shall have been approved by the commissioner with such changes, if any, required by him, the same shall be approved by a vote of not less than two-thirds of those members of such organization or association voting in person or by proxy at a meeting of the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

9101.

The meeting of members at which the transaction is voted upon shall be preceded by a written or printed notice of the meeting and of the purpose to vote thereat upon the plan or agreement for reinsurance, transfer and assumption, addressed to each member of record on the date of the notice and mailed at least 30 days before the date fixed for the meeting. The presence in person or by proxy of 5 percent of the members of such organization or association entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum unless a higher percentage is required by the articles of incorporation, association, bylaws, rules or regulations or other organization or governing documents. In the absence of a quorum, the members present at the meeting in person or by proxy may adjourn the meeting to a later date and no further notice need be given of the date to which the meeting is adjourned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

If the members vote to approve the plan of reinsurance, transfer and assumption, a certified copy of all proceedings relating thereto shall be filed with the commissioner. If the commissioner finds that the proceedings have been in accordance with the law and his requirements, he shall issue his certificate approving the plan and the agreement and the transaction shall become effective at that time or upon such later date as may be specified in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

The board of directors or other governing body of such organization or association shall file with the Secretary of State a duplicate original of the commissioner’s certificate approving the plan and agreement and thereupon such organization or association shall cease to exist except for the purpose of completing the winding up of its affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Underwriters Fire Patrols [10020. - 10080.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope of Chapter and Definitions [10020. - 10022.]

10020.

As used in this chapter, an underwriters’ corps means a corps of men with proper officers and equipment, maintained to discover and prevent fires and save life and property from fire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10021.

This chapter shall not impair or interfere with the powers or duties of the regular fire department of any municipality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10022.

Any act of an underwriters’ corps shall not justify any owner of any property in abandoning such property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation and Organization [10040. - 10040.]

10040.

Any domestic corporation of insurance underwriters, organized to discover and prevent fires and save life and property from fire and doing business within any municipal corporation of this State, may at its own expense maintain an underwriter’s corps.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers [10050. - 10052.]

10050.

For the effective discharge of such duties, an underwriter’s corps may enter any burning building or any building in which property is burning, or any building such corps or any officer thereof deems to be immediately exposed to an existing fire or in danger of taking fire from a burning building, and may remove or otherwise protect any property from fire or damage by water during and immediately after such fire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10051.

Such corporation, with its officers and corps, when going to a fire with its equipment, has the same right of way as the regular fire department of the municipality in which such corporation is operating, except as to such fire department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10052.

All ordinances passed by the municipal authorities of any city or town wherein such a corporation carries on business, and all laws of this State applicable to such municipality which provide for the punishment of any person or persons wilfully or carelessly obstructing the progress of the apparatus of the fire department of such municipality while going to a fire, or of any person or persons wilfully or carelessly injuring any animal or property of said fire department, shall likewise apply to such corporation to the same extent as to such fire department. Such laws and ordinances and their penalties, may be enforced in the same courts and in the same manner, and with equal force and effect in the case of such corporation as in the case of the fire department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Meetings and Assessments [10070. - 10080.]

10070.

In July of every year, there shall be held a meeting of every corporation created for the purpose specified in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10071.

Ten days’ notice of the meeting shall be inserted in at least one daily newspaper published in the municipality in which the corporation is established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10072.

At such meeting each insurer or insurance agent, doing a fire insurance business in the municipality, whether a member of the corporation or not, has a right to be represented and is entitled to one vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10073.

A majority of the whole number so represented may decide the question of sustaining the fire patrol organized by the corporation and may fix the maximum amount of expenses to be incurred therefor during the ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10074.

The amount of expense so fixed shall not exceed two per cent of the aggregate premiums returned as received, as provided in section 10076. The whole of such amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be assessed upon all insurers or insurance agents who assume risks or accept premiums for fire insurance in said municipality. Such assessment shall be made in proportion to the several amounts of premiums returned as received by each in the statement required by section 10076.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10075.

Such assessment is collectible by and in the name of the corporation, in any court of competent jurisdiction, in such manner and at such time or times as the corporation determines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10076.

In order to pay persons employed by the corporation, and to maintain apparatus for saving life and property and suitable quarters the corporation may require a statement to be furnished, semiannually, by all persons mentioned in section 10074, setting forth the aggregate amount of premiums received for insuring property in the municipality during the six months next preceding July first and January first, respectively, of each year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10077.

Each statement shall be under oath and shall be handed to the secretary of the corporation within ten days after each first day of July and each first day of January. A statement covering the receipts of a natural person shall be sworn to by the person whose receipts it covers. Otherwise the statement shall be sworn to by the president, secretary or agent of the person whose receipts it covers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10078.

The secretary of such corporation shall, within the prescribed ten days, by written demand signed by him, require the statement from every person assessable under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10079.

The demand may be delivered personally at the office of every person required to furnish the statement. Every such person, or officer thereof, who, for fifteen days after said demand, neglects to render the statement forfeits fifty dollars for the use of the corporation, and also forfeits for its use twenty-five dollars in addition for every day such neglect is continued after the expiration of the fifteen days. Such additional penalty may be computed and collected up to the time of the trial of any action brought for its recovery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10080.

The corporation may bring action to recover such penalty, with costs, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Earthquake Insurance [10081. - 10089.4.]

10081.

No policy of residential property insurance may be issued or delivered or, with respect to policies in effect on the effective date of this chapter, initially renewed in this state by any insurer unless the named insured is offered coverage for loss or damage caused by the peril of earthquake as provided in this chapter. That coverage may be provided in the policy of residential property insurance itself, either by specific policy provision or endorsement, or in a separate policy or certificate of insurance which specifically provides coverage for loss or damage caused by the peril of earthquake alone or in combination with other perils.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10082.

(a) The offer required by Section 10081 shall include coverage against risk of loss or damage from the peril of earthquake, in accordance with the minimum coverages required by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10089.

(b) The earthquake coverage shall be in accordance with the insurer’s rules and rating plan, provided, however, that nothing contained in this chapter shall require an insurer to issue a policy of residential property insurance except in accordance with the
 insurer’s usual underwriting standards. However, those standards shall not permit an insurer to provide a policy of residential property insurance unless the offer of coverage required by this chapter is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10082.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following provisions regarding loss requirements, appraisals, and adjusters shall apply to the following types of policies originated or renewed on and after January 1, 2002: all policies of residential property insurance, as defined in Section 10087, all policies, endorsements, or certificates of insurance providing coverage for loss or damage caused by the peril of earthquake issued pursuant to this chapter; and all policies of basic residential earthquake insurance issued pursuant to Chapter 8.6 (commencing with
 Section 10089.5). 
Requirements in case loss occurs
The insured shall give written notice to this company of any loss without unnecessary delay, protect the property from further damage, forthwith separate the damaged and undamaged personal property, put it in the best possible order, furnish a complete inventory of the destroyed, damaged and undamaged property, showing in detail quantities, costs, actual cash value and amount of loss claimed; and within 60 days after the loss, unless the time is extended in writing by this company, the insured shall render to this company a proof of loss, signed and sworn to by the insured, stating the knowledge and belief of the insured as to the following: the time and origin of the loss, the interest of the insured and of all others in the property, the actual cash value of each item
 thereof and the amount of loss thereto, all encumbrances thereon, all other contracts of insurance, whether valid or not, covering any of said property, any changes in the title, use, occupation, location, possession or exposures of said property since the issuing of this policy, by whom and for what purpose any building herein described and the several parts thereof were occupied at the time of loss and whether or not it then stood on leased ground, and shall furnish a copy of all the descriptions and schedules in all policies and, if required and obtainable, verified plans and specifications of any building, fixtures or machinery destroyed or damaged. The insured, as often as may be reasonably required and subject to the provisions of Section 2071.1, shall exhibit to any person designated by this company all that remains of any property herein described, and submit to examinations under oath by any person named by this company, and subscribe the same; and, as often as may be reasonably required, shall
 produce for examination all books of account, bills, invoices and other vouchers, or certified copies thereof if originals be lost, at such reasonable time and place as may be designated by this company or its representative, and shall permit extracts and copies thereof to be made. The insurer shall inform the insured that tax returns are privileged against disclosure under applicable state law but may be necessary to process or determine the claim.

The insurer shall notify every claimant that they may obtain, upon request, copies of claim-related documents. For purposes of this section, “claim-related documents” means all documents that relate to the evaluation of damages, including, but not limited to, repair and replacement estimates and bids, appraisals, scopes of loss, drawings, plans, reports, third party findings on the amount of loss, covered damages, and cost of repairs, and all other valuation, measurement, and loss adjustment calculations of the amount of
 loss, covered damage, and cost of repairs. However, attorney work product and attorney-client privileged documents, and documents that indicate fraud by the insured or that contain medically privileged information, are excluded from the documents an insurer is required to provide pursuant to this section to a claimant. Within 15 calendar days after receiving a request from an insured for claim-related documents, the insurer shall provide the insured with copies of all claim-related documents, except those excluded by this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect existing litigation discovery rights. 
Appraisal
In case the insured and this company shall fail to agree as to the actual cash value or the amount of loss, then, on the written request of either, each shall select a competent and disinterested
 appraiser and notify the other of the appraiser selected within 20 days of the request. Where the request is accepted, the appraisers shall first select a competent and disinterested umpire; and failing for 15 days to agree upon the umpire, then, on request of the insured or this company, the umpire shall be selected by a judge of a court of record in the state in which the property covered is located. Appraisal proceedings are informal unless the insured and this company mutually agree otherwise. For purposes of this section, “informal” means that no formal discovery shall be conducted, including depositions, interrogatories, requests for admission, or other forms of formal civil discovery, no formal rules of evidence shall be applied, and no court reporter shall be used for the proceedings. The appraisers shall then appraise the loss, stating separately actual cash value and loss to each item; and, failing to agree, shall submit their differences, only, to the umpire. An award in writing, so itemized, of
 any two when filed with this company shall determine the amount of actual cash value and loss. Each appraiser shall be paid by the party selecting him or her and the expenses of appraisal and umpire shall be paid by the parties equally. In the event of a government-declared disaster, as defined in the Government Code, appraisal may be requested by either the insured or this company but shall not be compelled. 
Adjusters
If, within a six-month period, the company assigns a third or subsequent adjuster to be primarily responsible for a claim, the insurer, in a timely manner, shall provide the insured with a written status report. For purposes of this section, a written status report shall include a summary of any decisions or actions that are substantially related to the disposition of a claim, including, but not limited to,
 the amount of losses to structures or contents, the retention or consultation of design or construction professionals, the amount of coverage for losses to structures or contents and all items of dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 583, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10082.5.

(a) If an insurer subject to this chapter charges an additional earthquake insurance premium or deductible because a dwelling fails to comply with paragraph (1), (2), or (3) and the dwelling is subsequently brought into compliance with any one of these paragraphs, then the additional premium or deductible attributed to noncompliance shall not be charged.

(1) Compliance with Section 19215 of the Health and Safety Code for the bracing, anchoring, or strapping of all water heaters to resist falling or horizontal displacement due to earthquake motion.

(2) Compliance with the foundation anchor bolt requirements of the 2007 edition of the California Building Standards Code as specified in Title 24 of the
 California Code of Regulations, or a successor edition of that code, or with any local government modifications to those requirements.

(3) Compliance with the bracing requirements for cripple walls of the 2007 edition of the California Building Standards Code as specified in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or a successor edition of that code, or with any local government modifications to those requirements.
